Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-102
Parties; how designated.

In all civil actions, the complaining party shall be known as the plaintiff and the adverse party as the defendant.

R.S.1867, Code § 3, p. 394;

R.S.1913, § 7561;

C.S.1922, § 8504;

C.S.1929, § 20-102;

R.S.1943, § 25-102.

Designation of party appealing as plaintiff in eminent domain proceeding was not prevented by this section. Jensen v. Omaha Public Power Dist., 159 Neb. 277, 66 N.W.2d 591 (1954).